Maryland, session 2025, SB0953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Develop a Realistic Electricity Plan for Maryland.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration, or the Director’s
designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0953*

SENATE BILL 953
(6) a member of the Public Service Commission, designated by the Chair of
the Public Service Commission;
(7) the People’s Counsel, or the People’s Counsel’s designee;
(8) a representative of PJM Interconnection, LLC, designated by PJM
Interconnection, LLC;
(9) a representative of Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, designated by
Baltimore Gas and Electric Company;
(10) a representative of Constellation Energy Corporation, designated by
Constellation Energy Corporation;
(11) a representative of Potomac Electric Power Company, designated by
Potomac Electric Power Company;
(12) a representative of Potomac Edison, designated by Potomac Edison;
(13) a representative of Delmarva Power, designated by Delmarva Power;
(14) a representative of Southern Maryland Electric Cooperative,
designated by Southern Maryland Electric Cooperative;
(15) a representative of an independent electricity generation company,
designated by the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration;
(16) a representative of the agricultural community, designated by the
Maryland Farm Bureau;
(17) a representative of the public with expertise in energy, appointed by the
Governor;
(18) two representatives of environmental nonprofit organizations, one
appointed by the President of the Senate and one appointed by the Speaker of the House;
and
(19) two representatives of Maryland ratepayers, one appointed by the
President of the Senate and one appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(c) The members of the Task Force shall elect the chair of the Task Force.
(d) (1) The Maryland Energy Administration shall provide staff for the Task
Force.
(2) The Task Force, through the Maryland Energy Administration, may
hire an independent consultant to assist in its work.

SENATE BILL 953 3
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) using the State’s energy policies as of July 1, 2025, for each of years
2026, 2030, 2035, and 2040, assemble and study realistic current:
(i) forecasts for the State’s electricity needs;
(ii) estimates of the percentage of electricity imported from out of
State; and
(iii) estimates of the cost of electricity purchased through the capacity
market that would be included in the monthly electric bills of Maryland ratepayers;
(2) for each of years 2030, 2035, and 2040, assemble and study realistic
current estimates of the cost of electricity purchased through the capacity market that
would be included in the monthly electric bills of Maryland ratepayers if the State imported
no more than 25% of the electricity needed to meet the State’s electricity demand;
(3) consider policy options and make recommendations for legislation that
would ensure the State purchases, in 2030, 2035, and 2040, no more than 25% of its
electricity from out–of–state sources; and
(4) consider policy options and make recommendations to ensure the
reliability and adequacy of the electricity available to Maryland ratepayers and businesses
through 2040.
(g) The policy options considered by the Task Force shall include:
(1) the expansion of nuclear energy generation in the State;
(2) the expansion of renewable energy resources in the State;
(3) the prioritization of energy storage facilities in the State; and
(4) upgrades and enhancements to transmission systems in the State as
they exist on July 1, 2025.

SENATE BILL 953
(h) On or before December 31, 2025, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, beginning July 1, 2025,
through May 1, 2026, the Public Service Commission may not issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity or otherwise approve the construction or expansion of any
transmission lines in the State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.